Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska4-109
Public benefits, defined.

For purposes
of sections 4-108 to 4-113, public benefits means any grant, contract, loan,
professional license, commercial license, welfare benefit, health payment
or financial assistance benefit, disability benefit, public or assisted housing
benefit, postsecondary education benefit involving direct payment of financial
assistance, food assistance benefit, or unemployment benefit or any other
similar benefit provided by or for which payments or assistance are provided
to an individual, a household, or a family eligibility unit by an agency of
the United States, the State of Nebraska, or a political subdivision of the
State of Nebraska.

Laws 2009, LB403, § 2.